Idaho, session 2025, H0374.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Agricultural Research and Extension
Service the following amounts to be expended according to the designated
expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $19,300
Operating Expenditures 230,800
TOTAL $250,100
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Agricultural Research and Extension Service is hereby increased by
forty-three hundredths (0.43) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 3. STRENGTHENING PARTNERSHIPS WITH INDUSTRY. The Agricul-
tural Research and Extension Service shall provide the Legislature with a
long-term financial operations plan for the Center for Agriculture, Food,
and the Environment (CAFE), including a detailed accounting of anticipated
expenses and sources of revenue. The financial operations plan should fo-
cus on strengthening partnerships with Idaho's dairy, ranching, and other
agricultural industries, including partnerships that might replace General
Fund expenditures in future fiscal years. The Agricultural Research and
Extension Service shall submit the plan to the Joint Finance-Appropriations
Committee by December 31, 2025. The format and content of the financial op-
erations plan will be determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy
Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 4. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.


SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.